Florida, session 2026, SB2516.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 58 59 Section 1.âSection 464.0195, Florida Statutes, is amended 60 to read: 61 464.0195âFlorida Center for Nursing; goals.â 62 (1)âThere is established within the University of South 63 Florida the Florida Center for Nursing to address issues of 64 supply and demand for nursing, including issues of recruitment, 65 retention, and utilization of resources that support the stateâs 66 nursing nurse workforce resources. The Legislature finds that 67 the center will repay the stateâs investment by providing an 68 ongoing strategy for the allocation of the stateâs resources 69 directed towards nursing. 70 (2)âThe primary goals for the center shall be to: 71 (a)âDevelop a strategic statewide plan for nursing manpower 72 in this state by: 73 1.âConducting a statistically valid biennial data-driven 74 gap analysis of the supply and demand of the health care 75 workforce. The center shall: 76 a.âEstablish and maintain a database on nursing supply and 77 demand in the state, to include current supply and demand. 78 b.âAnalyze the current and future supply and demand in the 79 state and the impact of this stateâs participation in the Nurse 80 Licensure Compact under s. 464.0095. 81 2.âDeveloping recommendations to increase nurse faculty and 82 clinical preceptors, support nurse faculty development, and 83 promote advanced nurse education. 84 3.âDeveloping best practices in the academic preparation 85 and continuing education needs of qualified nurse educators, 86 nurse faculty, and clinical preceptors. 87 4.âCollecting data on nurse faculty, employment, 88 distribution, and retention. 89 5.âPiloting innovative projects to support the recruitment, 90 development, and retention of qualified nurse faculty and 91 clinical preceptors. 92 6.âEncouraging and coordinating the development of 93 academic-practice partnerships, including partnerships with 94 hospitals which provide opportunities for nursing students to 95 obtain clinical experience, to support nurse faculty employment 96 and advancement. 97 7.âDeveloping distance learning infrastructure for nursing 98 education and advancing faculty competencies in the pedagogy of 99 teaching and the evidence-based use of technology, simulation, 100 and distance learning techniques. 101 (b)âEnhance and promote recognition, reward, and renewal 102 activities for nurses in the state by: 103 1.âPromoting nursing excellence programs such as magnet 104 recognition by the American Nurses Credentialing Center; 105 2.âProposing and creating additional reward, recognition, 106 and renewal activities for nurses; and 107 3.âPromoting media and positive image-building efforts for 108 nursing. 109 (c)âConvene various groups representative of nurses, other 110 health care providers, business and industry, consumers, 111 lawmakers, and educators to: 112 1.âReview and comment on data analysis prepared for the 113 center; 114 2.âRecommend systemic changes, including strategies for 115 implementation of recommended changes; and 116 3.âEvaluate and report the results of these efforts to the 117 Legislature and other entities. 118 (3)âThe Board of Nursing shall include on its initial and 119 renewal application forms a question asking each nurse to 120 voluntarily contribute to funding the Florida Center for Nursing 121 in addition to paying the fees imposed at the time of licensure 122 and licensure renewal. Revenues collected from nurses over and 123 above the required fees shall be transferred from the Medical 124 Quality Assurance Trust Fund to the Grants and Donations Trust 125 Fund within the Department of Health and shall be used solely to 126 support and maintain the goals and functions of the center. 127 Before giving a nurse the opportunity to contribute to funding 128 the center at the time of licensure renewal, the Board of 129 Nursing shall provide the nurse with a summary of the centerâs 130 work, a link to the centerâs Internet website, and the following 131 statement: âThe Florida Center for Nursingâs operating revenues 132 are derived in part from your donation. In order for the Florida 133 Center for Nursing to continue its work on behalf of nurses, 134 please donate.â 135 (4)âThe center may request from the board, and the board 136 must provide to the center upon its request, any information 137 held by the board regarding nurses licensed in this state or 138 holding a multistate license pursuant to s. 464.0095 or 139 information reported to the board by employers of such nurses, 140 other than personal identifying information. 141 (5)âThe center shall administer the Linking Industry to 142 Nursing Education (LINE) Fund pursuant to s. 1009.8962. 143 (a)âThe center shall proactively promote to eligible 144 institutions the availability of matching funds through the LINE 145 Fund before the opening of the annual application period. 146 (b)âThe center shall provide technical assistance to 147 eligible institutions before, during, and after the award 148 process to maximize the success of the program statewide. 149 (c)âTo administer the application, evaluation, and 150 distribution of LINE Fund grants under s. 1009.8962, the center 151 shall develop and make publicly available on its website the 152 guidelines for the LINE Fund administration, including: 153 1.âAny application procedures and deadlines. 154 2.âThe criteria for program eligibility and funding 155 priorities. 156 3.âA preapproval process to assist applicants with planning 157 for the annual application process. 158 4.âA process to ensure the fair evaluation of all submitted 159 proposals and determination of award recipients. 160 5.âThe process that each type of eligible institution must 161 follow to certify the receipt of the pledged contributions from 162 any partner organizations before receiving any matching state 163 funds. 164 6.âReporting and accountability standards for grant 165 recipients that apply for or receive LINE funds, including 166 actions the center may consider when an institution materially 167 fails to comply with any program requirements or standards. 168 (6)(5)âNo later than each January 10, the center shall 169 submit a report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, 170 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives providing 171 details of its activities during the preceding calendar year in 172 pursuit of its goals and in the execution of its duties under 173 subsection (2), including a nursing education program report. 174 The center shall annually update the report no later than 175 February 10, to include data related to the NCLEX examination. 176 Section 2.âParagraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (18) of 177 section 1009.26, Florida Statutes, as amended by section 7 of 178 chapter 2025-199, Laws of Florida, are amended to read: 179 1009.26âFee waivers.â 180 (18)(a)âFor every course in a Program of Strategic 181 Emphasis, or in a state-approved teacher preparation program 182 identified by the Board of Governors, as identified in 183 subparagraph 3., in which a student is enrolled and has out-of 184 pocket expenses for tuition and fees after all other federal, 185 state, and institutional gift aid is applied, a state university 186 shall waive 100 percent of the tuition and fees of the studentâs 187 out-of-pocket expenses for an equivalent course in such program 188 for a student who: 189 1.âIs a resident for tuition purposes under s. 1009.21. 190 2.âHas earned at least 60 semester credit hours towards a 191 baccalaureate degree within 2 academic years after initial 192 enrollment at a Florida public postsecondary institution. 193 3.âEnrolls in one of 10 Programs of Strategic Emphasis as 194 adopted by the Board of Governors or a state-approved teacher 195 preparation program. The Board of Governors shall adopt eight 196 Programs of Strategic Emphasis in science, technology, 197 engineering, or math; beginning with the 2022-2023 academic 198 year, two Programs of Strategic Emphasis in the critical 199 workforce gap analysis category; and beginning with the 2023 200 2024 academic year, two state-approved teacher preparation 201 programs for which a student may be eligible to receive the 202 tuition and fee waiver authorized by this subsection. The 203 programs identified by the board must reflect the priorities of 204 the state and be offered at a majority of state universities at 205 the time the Board of Governors approves the list. 206 (c)âUpon enrollment in a Program of Strategic Emphasis or a 207 state-approved teacher preparation program, the tuition and fees 208 waived under this subsection must be reported for state funding 209 purposes under ss. 1009.534 and 1009.535 and must be disbursed 210 to the student. The amount disbursed to the student must be 211 equal to the award amount the student has received under s. 212 1009.534(3) or s. 1009.535(2). 213 Section 3.âSubsections (2) through (10) of section 214 1009.8962, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 215 1009.8962âLinking Industry to Nursing Education (LINE) 216 Fund.â 217 (2)âRecognizing that the state has a persistent and growing 218 nursing shortage and shortages in other related health science 219 professions, it is the intent of the Legislature to address this 220 critical workforce need by incentivizing collaboration between 221 nursing education and related health science programs and health 222 care partners through the establishment of the LINE Fund. This 223 fund is intended to meet local, regional, and state workforce 224 demand by recruiting faculty and clinical preceptors, increasing 225 the capacity of high-quality nursing education and related 226 health science programs, and increasing the number of nursing 227 education and related health science program graduates who are 228 prepared and licensed to enter the workforce. 229 (3)âAs used in this section, the term: 230 (a)ââCenterâ means the Florida Center for Nursing within 231 the University of South Florida, established by s. 464.0195. 232 (b)(a)ââHealth care partnerâ means a health care provider 233 as defined in s. 768.38(2) that is licensed to operate in this 234 state. The center may also consider any of the following types 235 of organizations that are connected to nursing education or the 236 nursing workforce as a âhealth care partnerâ for the purpose of 237 evaluating an institutionâs proposal and a pledged contribution 238 for matching LINE funds. 239 1.âAn organization that manufactures or sells durable 240 medical equipment or simulation equipment that demonstrably 241 enhances or supplements a nursing studentâs education. 242 2.âAn organization that provides educational materials or 243 instruction related to preparation to pass a nationally 244 recognized nursing licensure examination. 245 3.âA health care organization active in this state which 246 employs or uses licensed nurses to deliver direct patient care. 247 4.âA nonprofit organization or fund with a 501(c)(3) 248 designation registered in this state for at least 2 years before 249 the date of the initial LINE grant application which is 250 organized primarily, or which makes other reportable charitable 251 contributions, to support the health care workforce of this 252 state through training or the continuing education of health 253 care professionals. 254 5.âA direct-support organization of an eligible applicant 255 whose match contribution supports an eligible purpose of the 256 grant. 257 (c)(b)ââInstitutionâ means a school district career center 258 under s. 1001.44; a charter technical career center under s. 259 1002.34; a Florida College System institution; a state 260 university; an independent nonprofit college or university 261 located and chartered in this state and accredited by an agency 262 or association that is recognized by the database created and 263 maintained by the United States Department of Education to grant 264 baccalaureate degrees; or an independent school, college, or 265 university with an accredited program as defined in s. 464.003 266 which is located in this state and licensed by the Commission 267 for Independent Education pursuant to s. 1005.31, or an 268 institution authorized under s. 1009.521, which has a nursing 269 education program that meets or exceeds the following: 270 1.âFor a certified nursing assistant program, a completion 271 rate of no more than 10 percent below the current national 272 average of at least 70 percent for the prior year. 273 2.âFor a licensed practical nurse, associate of science in 274 nursing, and bachelor of science in nursing program, a first 275 time passage rate on the National Council of State Boards of 276 Nursing Licensing Examination of no more than 10 percent below 277 the current national average, of at least 75 percent for the 278 prior year based on a minimum of 10 testing participants. 279 (d)ââRelated health scienceâ means a program that prepares 280 graduates to provide direct patient care or diagnostic services 281 that advance patient care in a health care setting, as defined 282 in s. 408.802, which are outlined in the State Board of 283 Educationâs Career and Technical Education Health Science 284 curriculum framework, and which are identified by the Department 285 of Education pursuant to subsection (10). 286 (e)(c)ââStudentâ means a person who is a resident for 287 tuition purposes pursuant to s. 1009.21 and enrolled in a 288 nursing education or a related health science education degree 289 or certificate program at an institution that is part of the 290 State Board of Educationâs Career and Technical Education Health 291 Science curriculum framework. 292 (4)âThe LINE Fund shall be administered by the center Board 293 of Governors for state universities and the Department of 294 Education for all other institutions. 295 (5)âSubject to available funds and the approval of an 296 application by the center, for every dollar contributed to an 297 institution by a health care partner, the fund shall provide a 298 dollar-to-dollar match to the participating institution to 299 implement the activities outlined in the institutionâs approved 300 proposal. Subject to available funds, the fund may also provide 301 a dollar-to-dollar match to the participating institution for 302 every dollar contributed to an institution or its direct-support 303 organization by an individual or entity that does not meet the 304 definition of a health care partner, provided the contribution 305 supports an eligible purpose of the LINE Fund. Contributions 306 from health care partners shall receive priority awarding 307 matching. 308 (6)(a)âFunds may be used for student scholarships;, 309 recruitment of additional faculty and clinical preceptors; 310 increasing program enrollment, program completion, and licensure 311 exam passage rates;, equipment;, and simulation centers, 312 internships, and clinical preceptorships; and other related 313 activities determined by the center to advance high-quality 314 nursing education programs and to expand the qualified nursing 315 workforce and related health science professions throughout the 316 state. 317 (b)âFunds may not be used for the construction of new 318 buildings but may be used to expand, retrofit, or upgrade 319 existing facilities if the proposal will result in increased 320 program enrollments or improved or modernized educational or 321 simulation space for nursing education or related health science 322 students. 323 (7)(a)âTo participate, an institution must submit a timely 324 and completed proposal to the center Board of Governors or 325 Department of Education, in a standardized format developed 326 under s. s. 464.0195(5) prescribed by the Board of Governors or 327 Department of Education, as applicable. 328 (b)âThe proposal must identify the specific a health care 329 partner located and licensed to operate in the state whose 330 monetary or nonmonetary contributions will be matched by the 331 fund on a dollar-to-dollar basis if the proposal is approved by 332 the center. 333 1.âExamples of allowable nonmonetary LINE Fund 334 contributions from health care partners include, but are not 335 limited to, the value of the donated use of health care partner 336 employees as nursing program instructors or clinical preceptors; 337 the value of the donated use of a health care partnerâs space or 338 equipment by a nursing education program; or the value of 339 donated goods and services, such as educational or simulation 340 equipment, licensure exam preparation materials and instruction, 341 or other similar quantifiable donated goods and services deemed 342 by the center to be good faith contributions that support the 343 goals of the LINE Fund. 344 2.âTo accept nonmonetary contributions as health care 345 partner matching funds, the applicant and the center must 346 quantify the value of the contribution in dollars and certify 347 that the proposed contribution directly supports the goals of 348 the LINE Fund outlined in subsection (1). 349 (c)âProposals for related health science programs other 350 than nursing may be considered, but may not be prioritized over 351 nursing programs. The proposal for such programs must be part of 352 the State Board of Educationâs Career and Technical Education 353 Health Science curriculum framework and include evidence that a 354 material regional workforce demand exists for that related 355 health science program. 356 (8)(a)âThe center Board of Governors or Department of 357 Education, as applicable, must review and evaluate each 358 completed and timely submitted proposal according to the 359 following minimum criteria, where applicable: 360 1.(a)âWhether funds committed by the health care partner 361 will contribute to an eligible purpose. 362 2.(b)âHow the institution plans to use the funds, including 363 how such funds will be utilized to increase student enrollment, 364 and program completion, or licensure exam test-takers or passage 365 rates. 366 3.(c)âHow the health care partner will onboard and retain 367 graduates or otherwise improve the likelihood that graduates 368 will successfully join the state or local workforce. 369 4.(d)âHow the funds will expand the institutionâs nursing 370 education and related health science programs to meet local, 371 regional, or state workforce demands. If applicable, this shall 372 include 373 5.âHow the proposal will enhance opportunities to pursue 374 and complete advanced education nursing education programs. 375 6.âand how How the funds will increase the number of 376 faculty and clinical preceptors and planned efforts to utilize 377 the clinical placement process established in s. 14.36. 378 (b)âThe center may assign priority consideration for grant 379 applications that will improve services in underserved 380 geographic areas or for programs and partnerships that address 381 the greatest workforce needs or gaps identified under s. 382 464.0195. 383 (c)âAfter reviewing and evaluating each timely submitted 384 proposal, the center must notify each applicant regarding which 385 of the following categories each of the institutionâs proposals 386 has been classified into, and provide a brief explanation for 387 the centerâs principal reason or reasons for reaching its 388 determination: 389 1.âApproved; 390 2.âProvisionally Approved; 391 3.âApproved, Pending Available Funding; or 392 4.âDenied for Funding. 393 (d)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 394 1.ââApprovedâ means that the center agrees that the 395 institutionâs proposal meets the criteria and intent of this 396 section, and the proposal will receive matching LINE funding 397 upon certification of the receipt of the health care partnerâs 398 contribution. 399 2.ââProvisionally Approvedâ means that the center agrees 400 that the institutionâs proposal makes a good faith effort to 401 meet the criteria and intent of this section, but the center 402 determined that additional information or amendments to the 403 proposal are necessary to bring the proposal into full 404 compliance with the requirements of this section. 405 a.âThe center may offer technical assistance to the 406 applying institution to ensure its resubmitted application meets 407 the full program requirements for funding. 408 b.âA Provisionally Approved proposal, if timely 409 resubmitted, may immediately move to an Approved proposal if the 410 center determines that the resubmitted proposal meets the full 411 requirements of this section, that sufficient LINE funds are 412 available to match the proposal, and that the proposal addresses 413 a high priority need for the state, such as serving underserved 414 geographic areas or closing identified workforce gaps. 415 3.ââApproved, Pending Available Fundingâ means that the 416 center agrees that the institutionâs proposal, or resubmitted 417 proposal, meets the criteria and intent of this section, but the 418 proposal will not receive matching LINE funds unless additional 419 LINE funding becomes available later in the fiscal year. The 420 availability of LINE Fund dollars to match proposals classified 421 as Approved, Pending Available Funding may result from: 422 a.âThe failure of another approved awardee to timely 423 certify the actual receipt of a health care partnerâs pledged 424 contributions. 425 b.âAdditional savings identified by the center from 426 previously appropriated LINE funds. 427 c.âA balance in the LINE Fund due to a lack of approved 428 proposals from a type of nursing education program, health 429 science program, or institution for which a specified amount of 430 LINE funds was identified in the General Appropriations Act for 431 a particular fiscal year. The center may set a date on or after 432 February 1 of each year when the center determines that an 433 insufficient number of approved or provisionally approved 434 proposals exist from the institutions provided priority 435 consideration by the Legislature in that fiscal year. After the 436 noticed date, the center may redistribute any remaining LINE 437 funds to highly ranked Approved, Pending Available Funding 438 proposals from any type of program or institution that can 439 certify, before June 30, the receipt of its health care 440 partnerâs contribution. 441 4.ââDenied for Fundingâ means that the institutionâs 442 proposal does not meet the full criteria or intent of this 443 section or that the institution has not timely certified the 444 receipt of an allowable health care partnerâs contribution. 445 (9)(a)âEach institution with an approved proposal must 446 certify to the center in a manner prescribed under s. 447 464.0195(5) the shall notify the Board of Governors or 448 Department of Education, as applicable, upon receipt of the 449 health care partnerâs contribution partner provided funds 450 identified in the approved proposal. The center may Board of 451 Governors or Department of Education, as applicable, shall 452 release grant funds, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, up to the 453 amount of the contribution certified as funds received by the 454 institution, including certifications made on a rolling or 455 periodic basis. 456 (b)âIf deemed to meet the long-term goals of the LINE Fund, 457 the center may award funds for an approved proposal for up to 3 458 academic years immediately following the academic year within 459 which the initial approval is granted. If the center approves a 460 multiyear award to an institution, it must notify the recipient 461 that the award amount in subsequent years is subject to a LINE 462 Fund appropriation and the continued certification of the health 463 care partnerâs contribution to match the multiyear award of 464 state funds. 465 (c)(b)âAnnually, by February 1, each institution awarded 466 grant funds in the previous fiscal year shall submit a report to 467 the center which Board of Governors or Department of Education, 468 as applicable, that demonstrates the expansion as outlined in 469 the proposal and the use of funds. At minimum, the report must 470 include, by program level, the number of additional nursing 471 education and related health science students enrolled; if 472 scholarships were awarded using grant funds, the number of 473 students who received scholarships and the average award amount; 474 and the outcomes of students as reported by the Office of 475 Reimagining Education and Career Help pursuant to s. 476 14.36(3)(l). 477 (10)(a)âThe Department of Education shall serve as the lead 478 entity for identifying and maintaining related health science 479 programs eligible for participation in the LINE Fund. 480 (b)âIn carrying out this subsection, the department shall 481 apply the State Board of Educationâs Career and Technical 482 Education Health Science framework as the basis for determining 483 program eligibility. 484 (c)âNo later than October 1, 2026, the department shall 485 compile and publish an initial list of LINE-eligible related 486 health science programs. In developing the list, the department 487 shall: 488 1.âCompile the current Career and Technical Education 489 Health Science pathways and programs; 490 2.âIdentify aligned health science programs offered 491 through: 492 a.âDistrict technical colleges and career centers; and 493 b.âFlorida College System institutions offering Career and 494 Technical Education-aligned health science certificates and 495 degrees; 496 3.âEstablish and apply alignment criteria, including 497 credential type and applicable licensure or certification 498 outcomes; and 499 4.âPublish and maintain an approved list of LINE-eligible 500 health science programs for use in administering the LINE Fund. 501 (d)âThe department shall review and update the list 502 annually to reflect updates to the Career and Technical 503 Education Health Science framework and changes to eligible 504 program offerings. 505 (e)âThe Office of Reimagining Education and Career Help 506 shall provide workforce and labor market demand data, including 507 information on statewide and regional health care workforce 508 shortages, projected job growth, and occupational demand, to the 509 department to support data-informed prioritization of LINE 510 funding. The office may not determine program eligibility The 511 Board of Governors shall adopt regulations and the State Board 512 of Education shall adopt rules to administer the fund, establish 513 dates for the submission and review of proposals, award funds, 514 and other regulations and rules necessary to implement this 515 section. 516 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.